Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 5. State of Alaska Teachers’ and Public Employees’ Retiree Health Reimbursement Arrangement Plan.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, including amendments to retiree health reimbursement arrangements authorized by AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Sec. 39.30.300.
State of Alaska Teachers’ and Public Employees’ Retiree Health Reimbursement Arrangement Plan established.

The State of Alaska Teachers’ and Public Employees’ Retiree Health Reimbursement Arrangement Plan is established for teachers who first become members of the defined contribution plan of the teachers’ retirement system under AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

on or after July 1, 2006, and employees of the state, political subdivisions of the state, and public organizations of the state who first become members of the defined contribution plan of the public employees’ retirement system under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

on or after July 1, 2006.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.310.
Purpose and effective date.

The purpose of the plan is to allow medical care expenses to be reimbursed from individual savings accounts established for eligible persons.

The plan becomes effective July 1, 2006, at which time contributions by employers begin.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.320.
Attorney general.

The attorney general of the state is the legal counsel for the plan and shall advise the administrator and represent the plan in a legal proceeding.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.330.
Administrator.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee is the administrator of the plan.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.335.
Appeals.

A final decision made under AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

is subject to appeal under AS 44.64.

History.

(§ 55 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.30.340.
Powers and duties of the administrator.

The administrator shall establish a teachers’ and public employees’ retiree health reimbursement arrangement plan trust fund in which the assets of the plan shall be deposited and held. The retiree health reimbursement arrangement plan trust fund may be a sub-trust of the Alaska retiree health care trust established under AS

39.30.097(b)

. The administrator has the same powers and duties with regard to the plan and the trust fund as provided in AS

14.25.003

and

14.25.004

.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 56 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.30.350.
Employer contribution fund.

The fund established under AS

39.30.340

is an employer contribution fund. The value of the fund reflects employer contributions, expenses, and investment gains and losses. Employee contributions to the fund are not permitted.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.360.
Management and investment of the fund.

The Alaska Retirement Management Board is the fiduciary of the fund and has the same powers and duties under this section in regard to the fund as are provided under AS

37.10.220

.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.370.
Contributions by employers.

For each member of the plan, an employer shall contribute to the teachers’ and public employees’ retiree health reimbursement arrangement plan trust fund an amount equal to three percent of the average annual compensation of all employees of all employers in the teachers’ retirement system and public employees’ retirement system. The administrator shall maintain a record for each member to account for employer contributions on behalf of that member. The board shall establish by regulation the rate of interest to be applied annually to the amount in a member’s individual account.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 57 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.30.380.
Termination of employment.

A person who terminates employment before meeting the eligibility requirements of AS

14.25.470

or AS

39.35.870

loses any right to the contributions made on behalf of the person to the teachers’ and public employees’ retiree health reimbursement arrangement trust fund. If a person returns to employment with a participating employer by December 31 of the year in which the person reaches 65 years of age, the person’s account balance shall be restored in the amount recorded on the date of termination from the trust, adjusted for inflation at the rate of the Consumer Price Index for Anchorage, Alaska. The earlier period of employment with a participating employer shall be credited toward eligibility for medical benefits.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.390.
Eligibility and reimbursement.

Persons who meet the eligibility requirements of AS

14.25.470

and AS

39.35.870

are eligible for reimbursements from the individual account established for a member under the plan, except members do not have to retire directly from the system. A person who is the dependent child of an eligible member is eligible for reimbursements if the eligible member and surviving spouse have both died so long as the person meets the definition of dependent child.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.400.
Benefits payable from the individual account.

The administrator may deduct the cost of monthly premiums from the individual account for retiree major medical insurance on behalf of an eligible person who elected retiree major medical insurance under AS

14.25.480

or AS

39.35.880

.

Upon application of an eligible person, the administrator shall reimburse to the eligible person the costs for medical care expenses as defined in 26 U.S.C. 213(d). Reimbursement is limited to the medical expenses of

an eligible member, the spouse of an eligible member, and the dependent children of an eligible member; or

a surviving spouse and the dependent children of an eligible member dependent on the surviving spouse.

When the member’s individual account balance is exhausted, the insurance premium deductions under (a) of this section and the reimbursement of medical care expenses under (b) of this section end.

If all eligible persons die before exhausting the member’s individual account, the account balance shall revert to the plan.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.410.
Exemption from taxation and process.

Contributions and other amounts held in the plan on behalf of a member or other person who is or may become eligible for benefits under the plan may be used only to reimburse eligible medical expenses, are exempt from Alaska state and municipal taxes and federal taxes to the extent allowed under the Internal Revenue Code, and are not subject to anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge of any kind, either voluntary or involuntary, before they are received by the person entitled to the amount under the terms of the plan. Any attempt to anticipate, alienate, sell, transfer, assign, pledge, encumber, charge, or otherwise dispose of any right to amounts accrued in the plan is void. However, a member’s right to receive benefits may be assigned

under a qualified domestic relations order; or

to a trust or similar legal device that meets the requirements for a Medicaid-qualifying trust under AS

47.07.020(f)

and 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4).

Notwithstanding AS

09.38.065

, contributions and other amounts held in the plan and benefits payable under this plan are exempt from garnishment, execution, or levy.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.420.
Amendment and termination of plan.

The state has the right to amend the plan at any time and from time to time, in whole or in part, including the right to make retroactive amendments referred to in 26 U.S.C. 401(b).

The plan administrator may not modify or amend the plan retroactively in such a manner as to reduce the benefits of any member accrued to date under the plan by reason of contributions made before the modification or amendment except to the extent that the reduction is permitted by the Internal Revenue Code.

The state may, in its discretion, terminate the plan in whole or part at any time without liability for the termination. If the plan is terminated, all investments remain in force until all individual accounts have been completely distributed under the plan, and, after all plan liabilities are satisfied, excess assets revert to the employer.

Any contribution made by an employer to the plan because of a mistake of fact must be returned to the employer by the administrator within one year after the contribution or discovery, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.430.
Exclusive benefit.

The corpus or income of the assets held in trust as required by the plan may not be diverted or used for other than the exclusive benefit of the participants.

The assets of the plan may not be used to pay premiums or contributions of the employer under another plan maintained by the employer.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.440.
Report to the Legislature on Health Care Cost-Saving Measures.

The Department of Administration shall provide an annual report to the legislature regarding the cost-saving measures it has implemented by regulation appropriate to current and future retirees in the health care system.

History.

(§ 142 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as sec. 142, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, and codified in 2005.

Sec. 39.30.495.
Definitions.

Unless the context requires otherwise, in AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

,

“administrator” means the commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee;

“board” means the Alaska Retirement Management Board established under AS

37.10.210

;

“compensation” has the meaning given in AS

14.25.590

;

“dependent child” has the meaning given in AS

39.35.680

;

“eligible person” means a person who meets the eligibility requirements of AS

14.25.470

or AS

39.35.870

;

“employer” has the meaning given in AS

14.25.590

for employers of teachers in the defined contribution plan established in AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

and has the meaning given in AS

39.35.990

for employers of public employees in the defined contribution plan established in AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

;

“fund” means the assets of the teachers’ and public employees’ retiree health reimbursement arrangement plan trust fund;

“individual account” means the record established by the administrator for individual employees under the teachers’ and public employees’ retiree health reimbursement arrangement plan;

“member” means a member of the defined contribution plan of the teachers’ retirement system in AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

or a member of the public employees’ retirement system in AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

;

“plan” means the State of Alaska Teachers’ and Public Employees’ Retiree Health Reimbursement Arrangement Plan established in AS

39.30.300

;

“qualified domestic relations order” has the meaning given in AS

14.25.220

.

History.

(§ 80 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)